Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Article 6 Genetic Parentage

15-8.1-601.
Scope.

This chapter governs procedures and requirements of genetic testing and genetic testing results of an individual to determine parentage and adjudication of parentage based on genetic testing, whether the individual voluntarily submits to testing or is tested pursuant to an order of the court or an administrative agency.

Genetic testing shall not be used to challenge the parentage of an individual who is a parent under articles 7 or 8 of this chapter or to establish the parentage of an individual who is a donor.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-602.
Requirements for genetic testing.

Genetic testing shall be of a type reasonably relied upon by scientific and medical experts in the field of genetic testing and performed in a testing laboratory accredited by a national association of blood banks or an accrediting body designated by the secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services (HHS).

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-603.
Authority to order or deny genetic testing.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, in a proceeding pursuant to this chapter to determine parentage, the court shall order the child and any other individual to submit to genetic testing if a request for testing is supported by the sworn statement of a party:

Alleging a reasonable possibility that the individual is the child’s genetic parent; or

Denying genetic parentage of the child and stating facts establishing a reasonable possibility that the individual is not a genetic parent.

Prior to a proceeding to establish genetic parentage and/or support in conformance with the state’s obligations under Title IV, Part D of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq., if the alleged genetic parent in response to a complaint supported by a sworn affidavit, filed by the office of child support services, denies parentage, the office of child support services shall have the authority to administratively order the parties to undergo genetic testing as described above, without the necessity of making application to the court, and the parties shall attend and submit to genetic testing under penalty of default.

The office of child support services may order genetic testing only if there is no presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated parent of a child other than the individual who gave birth to the child.

The court or office of child support services shall not order in utero genetic testing.

If two (2) or more individuals are subject to court-ordered genetic testing, the court may order that testing be completed concurrently or sequentially.

Genetic testing of an individual who gave birth to a child is not a condition precedent to testing of the child and an individual whose genetic parentage of the child is being determined. If the individual who gave birth is unavailable or declines to submit to genetic testing, the court may order genetic testing of the child and each individual whose genetic parentage of the child is being adjudicated.

In a proceeding to adjudicate parentage of a child having an acknowledged, adjudicated, de facto, presumed parent or intended parent, the court may deny a motion seeking an order for genetic testing or deny admissibility of the test results at trial if it determines that:

The conduct of the parties estops a party from denying parentage; or

It would be an inequitable interference with the relationship between the child and an acknowledged, adjudicated, de facto, presumed, or intended parent, or would otherwise be contrary to the best interests of the child as provided in subsection (h) of this section.

In determining whether to deny a motion seeking an order for genetic testing under this chapter or a request for admission of such test results at trial, the court shall consider the best interests of the child, including the following factors, if relevant:

The length of time between the proceeding to adjudicate parentage and the time that a parent was placed on notice that genetic parentage is at issue;

The length of time during which the parent has assumed a parental role for the child;

The facts surrounding discovery that genetic parentage is at issue;

The nature of the relationship between the child and the parent;

The age of the child;

Any adverse effect on the child that may result if parentage is successfully disproved;

The nature of the relationship between the child and any alleged parent;

The extent to which the passage of time reduces the chances of establishing the parentage of another individual and a child support obligation in favor of the child; and

Any additional factors that may affect the equities arising from the disruption of the relationship between the child and the parent or the chance of an adverse effect on the child.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 395, § 3, effective July 14, 2021.

15-8.1-604.
Genetic testing results.

An individual shall be identified as a genetic parent of a child if the genetic testing of the individual complies with this chapter and the results of testing disclose that the individual has at least a ninety-nine percent (99%) probability of parentage as determined by the testing laboratory.

Identification of a genetic parent through genetic testing does not establish parentage absent adjudication under this chapter and a court may rely on nongenetic evidence to determine parentage, including parentage by acknowledgment pursuant to article 3 of this chapter or by admission pursuant to §

15-8.1-111

, presumed parentage under article 4 of this chapter, de facto parentage under article 5 of this chapter, and parentage by intended parents under articles 7 or 8 of this chapter.

An individual identified under subsection (a) of this section as a genetic parent of a child may rebut the genetic testing results only by other genetic testing satisfying the requirements of this chapter that:

Excludes the individual as a genetic parent of the child; or

Identifies an individual, other than the individual who gave birth to the child, as a possible genetic parent of the child.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-605.
Report of genetic testing.

A report of genetic testing shall be in a record and signed under the penalty of perjury by a designee of the testing laboratory. A report made under the requirements of this chapter is self-authenticating.

A party in possession of results of genetic testing shall provide such results to all other parties to the parentage action upon receipt of the results and not later than fifteen (15) days before any hearing at which the results may be admitted into evidence.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-606.
Admissibility of results of genetic testing.

Unless waived by the parties, a party intending to rely on the results of genetic testing shall do all of the following:

Make the test results available to the other parties to the parentage action at least fifteen (15) days prior to any hearing at which the results may be admitted into evidence;

Provide notice to the court and other parties to the proceeding of the intent to use the test results at the hearing; and

Provide the other parties notice of this statutory section, including the need to object in a timely fashion.

Any motion objecting to genetic test results shall be made in writing to the court and to the party intending to introduce the evidence at least seven (7) days prior to any hearing at which the results may be introduced into evidence. If no timely objection is made, the written results shall be admissible as evidence without the need for foundation testimony or other proof of authenticity or accuracy.

If a child has a presumed parent, acknowledged parent, de facto parent, or adjudicated parent, the results of genetic testing shall be admissible to adjudicate parentage only:

With the consent of each individual who is a parent of the child under this chapter, unless the court finds that admission of the testing is in the best interests of the child as provided in §

15-8.1-603(h)

; or

Pursuant to an order of the court under §

15-8.1-603

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-607.
Additional genetic testing.

The court shall order additional genetic testing upon the request of a party who contests the result of the initial testing. If the initial genetic testing identified an individual as a genetic parent of the child under §

15-8.1-604

, the court shall not order additional testing unless the party provides advance payment for the testing.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-608.
Adjudication of parentage of child with alleged genetic parent.

If genetic testing results, pursuant to §

15-8.1-604

, exclude an individual as the genetic parent of a child, the court shall find that individual is not a genetic parent of the child and may not adjudicate the individual as the child’s parent on the basis of genetic testing.

If genetic testing results, pursuant to §

15-8.1-604

, identify an individual as the genetic parent of a child and the only other individual with a claim to parentage of the child is the individual who gave birth to the child, the court shall find that individual to be the genetic parent and may adjudicate the individual as the child’s parent if the alleged genetic parent:

Is identified under § 15-8.1-604 as a genetic parent of the child and the identification is not successfully rebutted under § 15-8.1-604;

Admits parentage in a pleading, when making an appearance, or during a hearing, the court accepts the admission, and the court determines the alleged genetic parent to be a parent of the child;

Declines to submit to genetic testing ordered by the court or the office of child support services, in which case the court may adjudicate the alleged genetic parent to be a parent of the child even if the alleged genetic parent denies a genetic relationship with the child;

Is in default after service of process and the court determines the alleged genetic parent to be a parent of the child; or

Is neither identified nor excluded as a genetic parent by genetic testing and, based on other evidence, the court determines the alleged genetic parent to be a parent of the child.

Subject to other limitations in this chapter, if in a proceeding involving an alleged genetic parent, at least one other individual in addition to the individual who gave birth to the child has a claim of parentage of the child, the court shall adjudicate parentage under §

15-8.1-206

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-609.
Costs of genetic testing.

The costs of initial genetic testing shall be paid:

By the office of child support services in a proceeding in which the office is providing services, if the office requests such testing;

As agreed by the parties or, if the parties cannot agree, by the individual who made the request for genetic testing; or

As ordered by the court.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, an individual who challenges a presumption, acknowledgment, or admission of parentage shall bear the cost for any genetic testing requested by such individual.

In cases in which the payment for the costs of initial genetic testing is advanced pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the office of child support services may seek reimbursement from the genetic parent whose parent-child relationship is established.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-610.
Deceased individual.

For good cause shown, the court may order genetic testing of a deceased individual.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-611.
Confidentiality of genetic testing.

A report of genetic testing for parentage is exempt from public inspection and copying pursuant to chapter 2 of title 38 (“access to public records act”), and shall be kept confidential and released only as provided in this chapter.

An individual shall not intentionally release a report of genetic testing or the genetic material of another individual for a purpose not relevant to a parentage proceeding without the written permission of the individual who furnished the genetic material. An individual who violates this section shall be imprisoned not more than one year, or fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-612.
Precluding establishment of parentage by perpetrator of sexual assault.

In a proceeding in which a person is alleged to have committed a sexual assault that resulted in the birth of a child, the person giving birth may seek to preclude the establishment of the other person’s parentage.

This section shall not apply if the person alleged to have committed a sexual assault has previously been adjudicated to be a parent of the child.

A complaint under this section must be preceded by the arrest and charge of the person alleged to have committed a sexual assault in violation of §§

11-37-2

or

11-37-8.1

on the plaintiff that resulted in the birth of the child.

In a parentage proceeding, the person giving birth may file a complaint, making an allegation under subsection (a) of this section at any time within two (2) years of the alleged sexual assault that resulted in the birth of the child.

During the pendency of proceedings on this complaint, the court may enter temporary orders regarding the defendant’s custody, contact and visitation with the child.

The standard of proof that a child was conceived as a result of the person sexually assaulting the person who gave birth to the child may be proven by the plaintiff by clear and convincing evidence that the person was convicted of a sexual assault against the person giving birth and that the child was conceived as a result of the sexual assault.

If the court finds that the burden of proof under subsection (f) of this section is met, the court shall enter an order:

Adjudicating that the person alleged to have committed the sexual assault is not a parent of the child and not entitled to have any contact, custody or visitation with the child;

Requiring the department of health amend the birth certificate to delete the name of the person precluded as a parent; and

Requiring that the person convicted of committing a sexual assault pay child support or birth-related costs, or both, unless the person giving birth requests otherwise.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-613.
Past liabilities.

For the purpose of this article, an action to determine the existence of a genetic parent and child relationship is not barred until four (4) years after the child reaches the age of majority.

A genetic parent’s liability for past education and necessary support and maintenance are limited to a period of six (6) years next, preceding the commencement of an action under this article.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.